Utah statutes.
10-9a-203.   Notice of intent to prepare a general plan or comprehensive
general plan amendments in certain municipalities.
(1)  Before preparing a proposed general plan or a comprehensive general plan
amendment, each municipality within a county of the first or second class
shall provide ten calendar days notice of its intent to prepare a proposed
general plan or a comprehensive general plan amendment:
(a)  to each affected entity;
(b)  to the Automated Geographic Reference Center created in Section
63F-1-506;
(c)  to the association of governments, established pursuant to an interlocal
agreement under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, of which the
municipality is a member; and
(d) (i)  on the Utah Public Notice Website created under Section 63F-1-701, if
the municipality:
(A)  is required under Subsection 52-4-202(3) to use that website to provide
public notice of a meeting; or
(B)  voluntarily chooses to provide notice on that website despite not being
required to do so under Subsection (1)(d)(i)(A); or
(ii)  to the state planning coordinator appointed under Section 63J-4-202, if
the municipality does not provide notice on the Utah Public Notice Website
under Subsection (1)(d)(i).
(2)  Each notice under Subsection (1) shall:
(a)  indicate that the municipality intends to prepare a general plan or a
comprehensive general plan amendment, as the case may be;
(b)  describe or provide a map of the geographic area that will be affected by
the general plan or amendment;
(c)  be sent by mail, e-mail, or other effective means;
(d) invite the affected entities to provide information for the municipality
to consider in the process of preparing, adopting, and implementing a general
plan or amendment concerning:
(i)  impacts that the use of land proposed in the proposed general plan or
amendment may have; and
(ii)  uses of land within the municipality that the affected entity is
considering that may conflict with the proposed general plan or amendment; and
(e)  include the address of an Internet website, if the municipality has one,
and the name and telephone number of a person where more information can be
obtained concerning the municipality's proposed general plan or amendment.
